en: Green olives stuffed of anchovies, Green olives stuffed with anchovy
es: Aceitunas verdes rellenas de anchoa
fi: vihreät anjovistäytteiset oliivit
fr: Olives vertes farcies à l'anchois, Olives vertes farcies aux anchois, Olives vertes fourrées aux anchois
hr: Zelene masline punjene inćunima
it: Olive ripiene di acciuge
nl: Ansjovisolijven

en: Green olives stuffed of peppers, Green olives stuffed with sweet peppers
es: Aceitunas verdes rellenas de pimiento
fi: vihreät paprikatäytteiset oliivit
fr: Olives vertes farcies au poivron, Olives vertes fourrées aux poivrons, Olives vertes farcies aux poivrons
hr: Zelene masline punjene paprikom
nl: Peperolijven
pl: Zielone oliwki nadziewane papryką

en: Green olives stuffed of lemon
es: Aceitunas verdes rellenas de limón
fr: Olives vertes farcies au citron
hr: Zelene masline punjene limunom
nl: Citroenolijven

en: Whole green olives, Green whole olives
de: ganze grüne Oliven
es: Aceitunas verdes enteras, Aceitunas verdes con hueso
fi: kokonaiset vihreät oliivit
fr: Olives vertes entières
hr: Cijele zelene masline
it: Olive verdi intere
nl: Hele groene olijven
pl: Zielone oliwki w całości

en: Whole marinated green olives
es: Aceitunas verdes enteras aliñadas
hr: Cijele marinirane zelene masline
nl: Gemarineerde hele olijven

en: Green olives in brine
fr: Olives vertes en saumure
hr: Zelene masline u salamuri
it: Olive verdi in salamoia
nl: Groene olijven op zout
pl: Zielone oliwki w zalewie

en: Marinated olives
bg: Мариновани маслини
de: Marinierte Oliven
es: Aceitunas aliñadas
fi: marinoidut oliivit
fr: Olives marinées
hr: Marinirane masline
it: Olive marinate
nl: Gemarineerde olijven
pl: Oliwki marynowane

en: Pitted olives
bg: Обезкостени маслини
de: kernlose Oliven, Entsteinte Oliven
es: Aceitunas deshuesadas, Aceitunas sin hueso
fi: kivettömät oliivit
fr: Olives dénoyautées
hr: Masline bez koštice
it: Olive snocciolate, Olive denocciolate
nl: Ontpitte olijven
ru: Оливки без косточки, Маслины без косточки
sv: urkärnade oliver

en: Black pitted olives, Pitted black olives
bg: Черни обезкостени маслини
de: schwarze entsteinte Oliven
es: Aceitunas negras deshuesadas, Aceitunas negras sin hueso
fi: mustat kivettömät oliivit
fr: Olives noires dénoyautées
hr: Crne masline bez koštice
it: Olive nere snocciolate
nl: Zwarte ontpitte olijven
ru: Чёрные маслины без косточки, Чёрные оливки без косточки, Оливки чёрные без косточки, Маслины чёрные без косточки
sv: urkärnade svarta oliver, svarta urkärnade oliver

en: Semi-ripe olives
es: Aceitunas de color cambiante
fr: Olives semi mures
hr: Poluzrele masline
nl: Halfrijpe olijven

en: Hojiblanca olives
es: Aceitunas hojiblanca
fr: Olives hojiblanca
nb: Hojiblancaoliven

en: Stuffed olives
da: fyldte oliven
de: Gefüllte Oliven
es: Aceitunas rellenas
fi: täytetyt oliivit
fr: Olives farcies
hr: Punjene masline
it: Olive ripiene
nl: Gevulde olijven
pl: Oliwki nadziewane
ru: Оливки с начинкой, Маслины с начинкой

en: Whole olives
bg: Цели маслини
de: Ganze Oliven
es: Aceitunas enteras, Aceitunas con hueso
fi: kokonaiset oliivit
fr: Olives entières
hr: Cijele masline
it: Olive intere
nl: Hele olijven
pl: Oliwki w całości

en: Whole black olives, Black whole olives
bg: Цели черни маслини
de: Ganze schwarze Oliven
es: Aceitunas negras enteras, Aceitunas negras con hueso
fi: kokonaiset mustat oliivit
fr: Olives noires entières
hr: Cijele crne masline
it: Olive nere intere
nl: Zwarte hele olijven
pl: Czarne oliwki w całości

en: Semi-ripe whole olives
es: Aceitunas de color cambiante enteras
hr: Poluzrele cijele masline
nl: Halfrijpe hele olijven

en: Halkidiki olives
xx: Prasines Elies Chalkidikis
da: Halkidikioliven
el: Πράσινες Ελιές Χαλκιδικής
it: Olive Halkidiki
pl: Oliwki Halkidiki, Oliwki Chalkidiki
sv: Halkidikioliver

en: Whole Halkidiki olives
da: Hele halkidikioliven
sv: Hela halkidikioliver

en: Pickled caper berries
es: Alcaparrones encurtidos
fr: Caprons au vinaigre
hr: Ukiseljene bobice kapara
nl: Kappertjes

en: Pickled capers, Capers pickled in vinegar
de: Eingelegte Kapern
es: Alcaparras encurtidas, Alcaparras en vinagre
fi: kapriksia liemessä
fr: Capres au vinaigre, Câpres au vinaigre
hr: Ukiseljene kapare
it: Capperi sottaceto
nl: Kapperappeltjes, Kappertjes in azijn

en: Capers
bg: Каперси
de: Kapernbeeren
hr: Kapari
ja: ケッパー
pl: Kapary